Missouri, session 2026, HB1649.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto seven new sections, to
be known as sections 537.880, 537.882, 537.884, 537.886, 537.888, 537.890, and 537.892, to
read as follows:
537.880. 1. The provisions of sections 537.880 to 537.892 shall apply to asbestos
actions filed on or after August 28, 2026, and to asbestos actions filed before August 28,
2026, unless the trial date in the asbestos action was set before January 1, 2026, and the
trial will begin on or before December 1, 2026.
2. The provisions of sections 537.880 to 537.890 shall not apply to asbestos
actions filed by or on behalf of any paid, volunteer, or retired firefighter, paramedic, or
emergency medical technician.
3. As used in sections 537.880 to 537.892, the following terms shall mean, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Asbestos action", any claim for damages or other relief presented in a civil
action arising out of, based on, or related to the health effects of exposure to asbestos
and any derivative claim made by or on behalf of a person exposed to asbestos or a
representative, spouse, parent, child, or other relative of that person;
(2) "Asbestos trust", a government-approved or court-approved trust, qualified
settlement fund, compensation fund, or claims facility created as a result of an
administrative or legal action or a court-approved bankruptcy or created under 11
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1649 2
U.S.C. Section 524(g), or 11 U.S.C. Section 1121(a), or other applicable provision of law
that is intended to provide compensation to claimants arising out of, based on, or related
to the health effects of exposure to asbestos;
(3) "Asbestos trust claim", any claim for compensation by an exposed person or
the exposed person's representative against any asbestos trust;
(4) "Claimant", any person bringing an asbestos action or asserting an asbestos
trust claim, including a personal representative if the asbestos action or asbestos trust
claim is brought by an estate, or a conservator or next friend if the asbestos action or
asbestos trust claim is brought on behalf of a minor or disabled person, as the terms
"minor" and "disabled person" are defined in section 475.010;
(5) "Exposed person", any person whose exposure to asbestos or to asbestos-
containing products is the basis for an asbestos action or an asbestos trust claim;
(6) "Trust claim materials", a final executed proof of claim and all documents
and information, including copies of electronic data and emails, submitted to or received
from an asbestos trust by a claimant or a claimant's representative, including claim
forms and supplementary materials, proofs of claim, affidavits, depositions and trial
testimony of the claimant and others knowledgeable about the claimant's exposure
history, work history, exposure allegations, medical and health records, all documents
that reflect the status of a claim against an asbestos trust, and, if the asbestos trust claim
has settled, all documents relating to the settlement of the asbestos trust claim;
(7) "Trust governance document", all documents that relate to eligibility and
payment levels, including claims payment matrices, trust distribution procedures, or
plans for reorganization for an asbestos trust.
537.882. 1. Within thirty days after an asbestos action is filed if the asbestos
action was filed on or after August 28, 2026, or within thirty days of August 28, 2026, for
an asbestos action that was filed before August 28, 2026, and is subject to the provisions
of sections 537.880 to 537.892, the claimant shall:
(1) Provide the court and parties with a sworn statement signed by the claimant
and claimant's counsel indicating that an investigation has been conducted and that all
asbestos trust claims that can be made by the claimant or any person on the claimant's
behalf have been completed and filed. The sworn statement shall indicate whether there
has been a request to defer, delay, suspend, toll, withdraw, or otherwise alter the
standing of any asbestos trust claim and provide the status and disposition of each
asbestos trust claim. A deferral or placeholder claim that is missing necessary
documentation for the trust to pay the claim shall not meet the requirements of this
section;

HB 1649 3
(2) Provide all parties with all trust claim materials from all law firms connected
to the claimant in relation to exposure to asbestos, including trust claim materials that
relate to conditions other than those that are the basis for the asbestos action.
Documents provided pursuant to this subdivision shall include an affidavit from the
claimant certifying that the trust claim materials are true and complete; and
(3) Produce all available asbestos trust claims filed by any individual other than
the claimant if the claimant's asbestos trust claim is based on exposure to asbestos
through that other individual and the materials are available to the claimant or
claimant's counsel.
2. The claimant shall have a continuing duty to supplement the statement and
materials required to be provided pursuant to subsection 1 of this section within thirty
days after the claimant files an additional asbestos trust claim, supplements an existing
asbestos trust claim, or receives additional trust claim materials related to any asbestos
trust claim made against an asbestos trust.
3. The court shall dismiss the asbestos action without prejudice if the claimant
fails to comply with the requirements of sections 537.880 to 537.890.
537.884. 1. Not less than sixty days before the date the trial in an asbestos action
is set to commence, if the defendant believes the claimant has not filed all asbestos trust
claims as required by section 537.882, the defendant may move the court for an order to
require the claimant to file the additional asbestos trust claims the defendant believes
the claimant is eligible to file.
2. Within ten days after the filing of the defendant's motion, the claimant shall:
(1) File the asbestos trust claims and produce all related trust claim materials; or
(2) File a written response with the court stating why there is insufficient
evidence for the claimant to file the asbestos trust claims.
3. Within ten days of the claimant filing a written response to the defendant's
motion, the court shall determine if there is a sufficient basis for the claimant to file the
asbestos trust claim identified in the defendant's motion.
4. If the court determines that there is a sufficient basis for the claimant to file an
asbestos trust claim identified in the defendant's motion, the court shall order the
claimant to file the asbestos trust claim and produce all related trust claim materials
within ten days. An asbestos action shall not proceed to trial until at least ninety days
after the claimant complies with the court's order.
537.886. 1. Trust claim materials and trust governance documents are presumed
to be relevant and authentic and are admissible in evidence in an asbestos action. No
claims of privilege apply to trust claim materials or trust governance documents.

HB 1649 4
2. A defendant in an asbestos action may seek discovery against an asbestos
trust. The claimant shall not claim privilege or confidentiality to bar discovery. The
claimant shall provide consent or any other expression of permission that may be
required by the asbestos trust to release information and materials sought by the
defendant.
3. Trust claim materials that are sufficient to entitle a claim to consideration for
payment under the applicable trust governance documents may be sufficient to support
a jury finding that the claimant was exposed to products for which the trust was
established to provide compensation and that such exposure was a substantial
contributing factor in causing the claimant's injury that is at issue in the asbestos action.
4. The parties in the asbestos action may introduce at trial any trust claim
materials or trust governance documents to prove, without limitation, alternative
causation for the exposed person's claimed injury, death, or loss to person; to prove that
the bankrupt entity is a joint tortfeasor, liable for the same injury or wrongful death for
the purposes of section 537.060; or to prove issues relevant to an adjudication of the
asbestos action, unless the exclusion of the trust claim material is otherwise required by
the rules of evidence.
537.888. 1. If a claimant proceeds to trial in an asbestos action before an
asbestos trust claim is resolved, there is a rebuttable presumption that the claimant is
entitled to, and will receive, the compensation specified in the trust governance
documents applicable to his or her claim at the time of trial. The court shall take
judicial notice that the trust governance documents specify compensation amounts and
payment percentages and shall establish an attributed value to the claimant's asbestos
trust claims.
2. In an asbestos action in which damages are awarded and setoffs are
permitted, a defendant is entitled to a setoff or credit in the amount of the actual
payment received by the claimant from the asbestos trust and the amount of the
valuation established under subsection 1 of this section. If multiple defendants are
found liable for damages, the court shall distribute the amount of setoff or credit
proportionally between the defendants, according to the liability of each defendant.
537.890. 1. If, subsequent to obtaining a judgment in an asbestos action, a
claimant files an additional asbestos trust claim with, or submits an additional asbestos
trust claim to, an asbestos trust that was in existence at the time the claimant obtained
the judgment, the claimant shall provide notice within ten days of such filing or
submission to the defendant and the trial court from which the judgment was obtained.
The trial court, upon the filing of a motion by a defendant or judgment debtor, has
jurisdiction and shall reopen the judgment in the asbestos action and adjust the

HB 1649 5
judgment by the amount of any asbestos trust payments obtained by the claimant after
the initial judgment and order any other relief that the court considers just and proper.
2. A defendant or judgment debtor shall file any motion pursuant to this section
within three years after the judgment was entered or taken.
537.892. 1. Within thirty days after an asbestos action is filed if the asbestos
action was filed on or after August 28, 2026, or within thirty days of August 28, 2026, for
an asbestos action that was filed before August 28, 2026, and is subject to the provisions
of sections 537.880 to 537.892, the claimant shall file a sworn information form
specifying the evidence that provides the basis for each claim against each defendant.
The sworn information form shall include all of the following with specificity:
(1) The name, address, date of birth, marital status, occupation, smoking history,
current and past worksites, and current and past employers of the exposed person, and
any person through whom the exposed person was exposed to asbestos;
(2) Each person through whom the exposed person was exposed to asbestos and
the exposed person's relationship to each person;
(3) Each person who is knowledgeable about each exposure;
(4) The manufacturer or seller of each asbestos or asbestos-containing product
and the specific product involved in each exposure, including any person through whom
the exposed person was exposed to asbestos;
(5) The specific location and manner of each exposure, including any person
through whom the exposed person was exposed to asbestos;
(6) The beginning and ending dates of each exposure, the frequency and
duration of each exposure, and the proximity of the asbestos-containing product or its
use to the exposed person and any person through whom the exposed person was
exposed to asbestos;
(7) The specific asbestos-related disease that is alleged;
(8) A certification that no prior asbestos actions have been made on the
claimant's behalf or, if the claimant has filed prior asbestos actions, information as to
the case name, case number, and court; and
(9) Any supporting documentation relating to the information required in this
subsection.
2. A claimant's obligation to provide sworn information pursuant to subsection 1
of this section is in addition to any court-ordered disclosures. Claimants have a
continuing duty to supplement the information that is required to be disclosed in
subsection 1 of this section within ten days after the claimant receives additional
information that is required to be disclosed.

HB 1649 6
3. The court, on motion by a defendant, shall dismiss the asbestos action without
prejudice as to any defendant whose product or premises is not identified in the
required disclosures set forth in subsection 1 of this section.
4. The court, on motion by a defendant, shall dismiss the asbestos action without
prejudice if the claimant fails to comply with the requirements of this section.
✔